Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 2. Rental Agreements.

Sec. 34.03.020.
Terms and conditions of rental agreement.

The landlord and tenant may include in a rental agreement clauses and conditions not prohibited by this chapter or by law, including rent, terms of agreement, and other provisions governing the rights and obligations of the parties.

In the absence of agreement, the tenant shall pay as rent the fair rental value for the use and occupancy of the dwelling unit.

Rent shall be payable without demand or notice at the time and place agreed upon by the parties. Unless otherwise agreed, rent is payable at the dwelling unit. Unless otherwise agreed, rent is payable at the beginning of any term of one month or less and otherwise in equal monthly installments. Unless otherwise agreed, rent shall be uniformly apportionable from day to day and shall be paid on the date the periodic tenancy begins and payable on or before the same date of each and every month thereafter until the tenancy terminates.

Unless the rental agreement fixes a definite term, the tenancy shall be week to week in the case of a tenant who pays weekly rent, and in all other cases month to month.

If required by the landlord, the landlord and the tenant shall include within the rental agreement, incorporate by reference in the rental agreement, or add as a separate attachment to the rental agreement a premises condition statement, setting out the condition of the premises, including fixtures but excluding reference to any of the other contents of the premises, and, if applicable, a contents inventory itemizing or describing all of the furnishings and other contents of the premises and specifying the condition of each of them. In the premises condition statement and contents inventory, the landlord and tenant shall describe the premises and its contents at the commencement of the term of the period of the occupancy covered by the rental agreement. When signed by the landlord and tenant, the premises condition statement and contents inventory completed under this subsection become part of the rental agreement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974; am § 13 ch 121 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 27 SLA 2014)

Editor’s notes. —

Sec. 13, ch. 27, SLA 2014 provides that the 2014 changes to (e) of this section made in that act “apply to a residential rental agreement for a period beginning on or after September 15, 2014.”

Sec. 34.03.030.
Effect of unsigned or undelivered rental agreement.

If the landlord does not sign and deliver a written rental agreement signed and delivered to the landlord by the tenant, acceptance of rent without reservation by the landlord gives the rental agreement the same effect as if it had been signed and delivered by the landlord.

If the tenant does not sign and deliver a written rental agreement signed and delivered to the tenant by the landlord, acceptance of possession and payment of rent without reservation gives the rental agreement the same effect as if it had been signed and delivered by the tenant.

If a rental agreement given effect by the operation of this section provides for a term longer than one year, it is effective only for one year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)

Sec. 34.03.040.
Prohibited provisions in rental agreements.

A rental agreement may not provide that the tenant or landlord

agrees to waive or to forego rights or remedies under this chapter;

authorizes a person to confess judgment on a claim arising out of the rental agreement;

agrees to the exculpation or limitation of any liability of the landlord or tenant arising under the law or to indemnify the landlord or tenant for that liability or the costs connected with it;

agrees to pay the landlord’s attorney fees.

A provision prohibited by (a) or (c) of this section included in a rental agreement is unenforceable. If a landlord or tenant wilfully uses a rental agreement containing provisions known by the person to be prohibited, the other party may recover the amount of actual damages.

A rental agreement between a mobile home park operator and a mobile home park tenant may not

deny a tenant of a mobile home park the right to sell the tenant’s mobile home within the park or require the resident or tenant to remove the mobile home from the park solely on the basis of the sale of the mobile home, nor may the mobile home park operator make a rule or regulation to the same effect, except that, within 30 days of written notice by the tenant of intent to sell the mobile home to a specified buyer, the operator or owner of the mobile home park may refuse to allow a sale for the following reasons:

the mobile home is in violation of laws or ordinances relating to health, safety or welfare;

the proposed buyer refuses to assume the same terms as are in the existing rental agreement; or

the proposed buyer does not have sufficient financial responsibility;

require a tenant to provide permanent improvements that become a part of the real property of the mobile home park owner or operator as a condition of tenancy in the mobile home park; however, the rental agreement may require the tenant to maintain existing conditions in the park;

require payment of any type of vendor or transfer fee either by a tenant in the mobile home park desiring to sell the tenant’s mobile home to another party or by any party desiring to purchase a mobile home from a tenant in the park as a condition of tenancy; however, this paragraph does not prevent the owner or operator from applying normal park standards to prospective tenants before granting or denying tenancy or from charging a reasonable vendor or transfer fee for services actually performed if the tenant is notified in writing of the amount of those charges before agreeing to move into the park; or

require the prospective tenant to pay a fee to enter the mobile home park or a tenant to pay a fee to transfer the tenant’s mobile home to another location outside the park; however, this paragraph does not prevent the owner or operator from charging a reasonable fee for services actually performed and if the tenant is notified in writing of the amount of those charges before agreeing to move into the park.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974; am §§ 1, 2 ch 138 SLA 1976)

Sec. 34.03.050.
Separation of rents and obligations to maintain property forbidden.

A rental agreement, assignment, conveyance, trust deed, or security instrument may not permit the receipt of rent free of the obligation to comply with AS

34.03.100(a)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)

Sec. 34.03.060.
Sublease and assignment.

Unless otherwise agreed in writing, the tenant may not sublet the premises or assign the rental agreement to another without the landlord’s consent.

The tenant’s right to sublease the premises or assign the rental agreement to another shall be conditioned on obtaining the landlord’s consent, which may be withheld only upon the grounds specified in (d) of this section; no further restrictions on sublease or assignment are enforceable.

When the rental agreement requires the landlord’s consent for sublease or assignment, the tenant may secure one or more persons who are willing to occupy the premises. Each prospective occupant shall make a written offer signed and delivered by the prospective occupant to the landlord, containing the following information on the prospective occupant:

name, age, and present address;

marital status;

occupation, place of employment, and name and address of employer;

number of all other persons who would normally reside with the prospective occupant;

two credit references, or responsible persons who will confirm the financial responsibility of the prospective occupant; and

names and addresses of all landlords of the prospective occupant during the prior three years.

Within 14 days after the written offer has been delivered to the landlord, the landlord may refuse consent to a sublease or assignment by a written rejection signed and delivered by the landlord to the tenant, containing one or more of the following reasonable grounds for rejecting the prospective occupant:

insufficient credit standing or financial responsibility;

number of persons in the household;

number of persons under 18 years of age in the household;

unwillingness of the prospective occupant to assume the same terms as are included in the existing rental agreement;

proposed maintenance of pets;

proposed commercial activity; or

written information signed by a previous landlord, which shall accompany the rejection, setting out abuses of other premises occupied by the prospective occupant.

In the event the written rejection fails to contain one or more grounds permitted by (d) of this section for rejecting the prospective occupant, the tenant may consider the landlord’s consent given, or at the tenant’s option may terminate the rental agreement by a written notice given without unnecessary delay to the landlord at least 30 days before the termination date specified in the notice.

If the landlord does not deliver a written rejection signed by the landlord to the tenant within 14 days after a written offer has been delivered to the landlord by the tenant, the landlord’s consent to the sublease or assignment shall be conclusively presumed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)